Maryland, session 2026, HB0257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
5–801.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0257*

HOUSE BILL 257
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Area of nontidal inundation” means an area within the State [which] THAT
is subject to inundation caused predominately by accumulated surface runoff or excess
rainfall runoff, or both.
(c) “Area of tidal inundation” means an area within the State [which] THAT is
subject to inundation caused predominately by tides or wind–driven waters, or both.
(d) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(e) “Federal flood insurance program” means the program established by the
National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended.
(f) “Flood hazard area” means an area of tidal or nontidal inundation resulting
from a 100–year flood event and established [pursuant to the provisions of] IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–803 of this subtitle.
(g) “100–year flood event” or “100–year flood” means a flood that has a 1% chance
of being equalled or exceeded in any given year.
(h) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Environment.
(i) “Subdivision” means:
(1) Any county, including Baltimore City; and
(2) Any incorporated municipality [which] THAT has the authority to
adopt and enforce land use and control measures for the areas within its jurisdiction.
5–802.
(a) The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Recurrent flooding [of a portion] of the State’s land resources [causes]
CAN CAUSE loss of life, damage to property, disruption of commerce and governmental
services, and unsanitary conditions, all of which are detrimental to the health, safety,
welfare, and property of the occupants of flood hazard areas of the State;
(2) Considerable public costs are incurred through the emergency
preparedness program and by replacing public utilities and other public capital
investments destroyed or damaged by floods;
(3) Flood waters disregard jurisdictional boundaries; and

HOUSE BILL 257 3
(4) The public interest necessitates management of waters and flood
hazard areas for the objectives of preventing and alleviating flood threats to life and health,
reducing private and public economic losses, and to the extent possible, preserving the
biological values associated with these land and water resources.
(b) The policy and purposes of this subtitle are:
(1) To assist in the guidance of development to minimize the impacts of
flooding, INCLUDING MANAGING STORMWATER AND PROTECTING WATER QUALITY;
(2) To provide State guidelines and technical assistance to [local
governments] SUBDIVISIONS in THE DEVELOPMENT OF FLOOD–RELATED
WATERSHED STUDIES AND management of flood hazard areas;
(3) To provide for comprehensive watershed AND FLOOD management;
(4) To facilitate THE implementation of projects for flood [control]
MANAGEMENT;
(5) To encourage and provide for [local governmental units]
SUBDIVISIONS to manage flood–prone lands in a comprehensive manner;
(6) To provide for the biological and environmental quality of the
watersheds of the State; and
(7) To establish a grant program to assist [local jurisdictions]
SUBDIVISIONS with:
(i) COMPLETION OF FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–803 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) Implementation of those capital projects included [within the
comprehensive] IN COMPREHENSIVE flood management plans [which] THAT are adopted
and approved in accordance with this subtitle; and
[(ii)] (III) Infrastructure repairs, watershed restoration, and
emergency protection work associated with a flood event.
5–803.
(a) (1) By January 1, [1982] 2028, AND EVERY 5 YEARS THEREAFTER, the
Department, after consultation with and consideration of recommendations submitted by
subdivisions [and], the Department of Agriculture, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES, THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, and
the Department of Planning, shall designate [a priority list of watersheds] PRIORITY

HOUSE BILL 257
WATERSHEDS for the purpose of [flood control planning and management and establish a
schedule for completion of these studies of these watersheds] REQUIRING SUBDIVISIONS
TO CONDUCT FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(2) IN DESIGNATING PRIORITY WATERSHEDS UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL GIVE PRIORITY CONSIDERATION TO
WATERSHEDS WITH A DEMONSTRATED HISTORY OF OR SIGNIFICANT POTENTIAL
FOR FLOOD–RELATED IMPACTS.
(b) (1) [The Department, in cooperation with the subdivisions and the
Department of Agriculture and the Department of Planning, shall conduct studies of the
watersheds designated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section which shall define at least:
(i) The existing magnitude and frequency of flood events;
(ii) The magnitude and frequency of flood events based on planned
development; and
(iii) Alternative management techniques according to their
effectiveness in controlling floods and minimizing flood damage.
(2) The studies shall address at least the 100–year flood event] SUBJECT
TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDING AND CONSISTENT WITH GUIDELINES
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT, A SUBDIVISION THAT CONTAINS A
DESIGNATED PRIORITY WATERSHED SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT A FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDY;
(II) ESTABLISH A SCHEDULE FOR THE COMPLETION OF THE
STUDY; AND
(III) ESTABLISH A SCHEDULE TO REGULARLY UPDATE THE
MODEL DATA, ASSUMPTIONS, QUALITY ASSURANCE, AND QUALITY CONTROL OF THE
STUDY.
(2) A FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDY REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) DEFINE THE AREA OF INUNDATION DURING A 10–, 25–,
100–, 500–, AND 1,000–YEAR FREQUENCY FLOOD EVENT, BOTH CURRENTLY AND
UNDER FUTURE SCENARIOS OF DEVELOPMENT AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS;

HOUSE BILL 257 5
(II) DESCRIBE THE MAGNITUDE OF IMPACT FOR EACH FLOOD
EVENT IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING
THE IMPACT TO:
1. ALL EXISTING STRUCTURES, ROADS, AND
SUBDIVISION STORMWATER MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS UNDER EXISTING
DEVELOPMENT CONDITIONS;
2. ALL EXISTING STRUCTURES, ROADS, AND
SUBDIVISION STORMWATER MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS UNDER PLANNED
DEVELOPMENT CONDITIONS; AND
3. EXISTING STRUCTURES, ROADS, AND SUBDIVISION
STORMWATER MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS UNDER FUTURE PRECIPITATION
CONDITIONS AND SEA LEVEL RISE PROJECTIONS; AND
(III) DESCRIBE THE FLOOD REDUCTION POTENTIAL OF VARIOUS
ALTERNATIVE MANAGEMENT TECHNIQUES AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING A
PRIORITIZED LIST OF ALTERNATIVE MANAGEMENT TECHNIQUES ACCORDING TO
THE EFFECTIVENESS OF EACH TECHNIQUE IN CONTROLLING THE IMPACT FOR EACH
FLOOD EVENT IDENTIFIED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(3) [By mutual agreement, the Department may delegate the
responsibility for carrying out all or part of the studies of priority watersheds to the
appropriate subdivisions] AS PART OF A FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDY
CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A SUBDIVISION SHALL:
(I) IN ACCORDANCE WITH CRITERIA DEVELOPED BY THE
DEPARTMENT AND FOR EACH FLOOD EVENT IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, DELINEATE THE AREA OF TIDAL AND NONTIDAL INUNDATION
ON GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) MAPS; AND
(II) SUBMIT THE MAPS TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR REVIEW AND
APPROVAL.
(4) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE SCHEDULE ESTABLISHED BY A
SUBDIVISION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A SUBDIVISION SHALL
SUBMIT A FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDY, AND ANY UPDATES TO THAT STUDY
APPROVED BY THE SUBDIVISION, TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR REVIEW AND
APPROVAL.
(c) [As a part of the study undertaken under subsection (b) of this section, the
Department shall delineate the flood hazard areas on maps showing areas of tidal and
nontidal inundation.

HOUSE BILL 257
(d)] (1) [By July 1, 1990 each subdivision, in cooperation with the Departments
of the Environment and Agriculture, the Department of Planning, and other appropriate
State agencies, shall prepare a flood management plan based upon an evaluation of
alternative management techniques and other findings included in studies conducted
under subsection (b) of this section] BY JANUARY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING, SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH
GUIDELINES TO ASSIST SUBDIVISIONS IN:
(I) CONDUCTING THE FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDIES
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) PREPARING THE GIS MAPS REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) Each COMPREHENSIVE flood management plan shall be consistent
with the purposes and provisions of this subtitle.
[(2)] (3) Management techniques may include:
(i) Flood control dams;
(ii) Levees and dikes;
(iii) Stormwater detention or retention structures;
(iv) Public acquisition;
(v) Flood proofing;
(vi) Storm drain and stream maintenance;
(vii) Tax adjustment policies;
(viii) Subdivision, zoning, and related ordinances; and
(ix) Other practical methods.
[(3)] (4) Management techniques shall include flood warning systems.
[(e)] (D) (1) (I) In any interjurisdictional watershed, those portions of the
COMPREHENSIVE flood management plans of the subdivisions relating to the watershed
shall be subject to review and approval by the Department as one plan.

HOUSE BILL 257 7
(II) Any comprehensive flood management plan [which] THAT
includes a project for which grant funds are requested under this section is subject to review
and approval by the Department.
(III) 1. If a plan is disapproved, the Secretary shall set forth in
writing the reason for disapproval.
2. Disapproval of a plan shall be based only on flood
management considerations.
(2) A SUBDIVISION COMPLETING A COMPREHENSIVE
FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDY FOR AN INTERJURISDICTIONAL WATERSHED
SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE WATERSHED–BASED COLLABORATION AMONG
SUBDIVISIONS; AND
(II) CONSULT WITH STATE AGENCIES, AS APPROPRIATE.
[(f)] (E) The Department and the subdivisions shall coordinate activities under
this section, INCLUDING THOSE ACTIVITIES IN INTERJURISDICTIONAL WATERSHEDS,
with all related programs, including the national flood insurance program, the STATE’S
sediment control program, and the [State water pollution control and abatement programs]
STATE’S STORMWATER MANAGEMENT PROGRAM.
[(g)] (F) (1) (I) Each subdivision shall implement the COMPREHENSIVE
flood management plan for its watershed.
(II) 1. If a subdivision so elects, the Department, in consultation
with the subdivision, shall prepare the regulations to implement the COMPREHENSIVE
flood management plan.
2. The subdivision shall adopt [these] THE regulations
PREPARED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH.
(III) 1. If a municipality elects and the county agrees, the county,
in consultation with the municipality, shall prepare the regulations TO IMPLEMENT THE
COMPREHENSIVE FLOOD MANAGEMENT PLAN.
2. If the county does not agree TO PREPARE REGULATIONS
UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, the Department, in
consultation with the municipality, shall prepare, if requested, the regulations.

HOUSE BILL 257
3. The municipality shall adopt the regulations prepared for
the municipality UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(IV) Implementation of the COMPREHENSIVE flood management
plans shall begin within 1 year after they are completed.
(2) (i) 1. Baltimore City and Baltimore County shall include in the
COMPREHENSIVE flood management plan for the Jones Falls watershed and adopt
regulations [prohibiting]:
A. PROHIBITING any person from erecting any new
residential structure or any substantial residential structural changes [which] THAT would
constitute any amount of encroachment into the 100–year floodplain of the nontidal Jones
Falls[,]; and [requiring]
B. REQUIRING all new nonresidential structures or
improvements, except flood control projects, to be elevated above the 100–year flood
elevation. [However, these]
2. THE restrictions UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH may be construed not to apply to any public works project of
Baltimore City, Baltimore County, or the State;
(ii) In issuing any manner of permit or approval to any person to
modify or renovate any existing structure or to modify the use of any open land area in the
100–year floodplain of the nontidal Jones Falls, Baltimore City or Baltimore County, AS
APPLICABLE, shall impose conditions to require that risk of injury to persons or property
shall be minimized to the greatest extent practicable.
[(h)] (G) (1) There is a comprehensive flood management grant program
within the Department.
(2) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may use proceeds from the State debt created to fund the comprehensive flood
management grant program to pay the entire cost OR A PORTION OF THE COST of
FLOOD–RELATED watershed studies [pursuant to] CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
subsection (b) of this section.
(ii) The Department may provide grants to subdivisions to pay the
entire cost OR A PORTION OF THE COST of CONDUCTING FLOOD–RELATED watershed
studies when the Department [delegates that responsibility pursuant to subsection (b) of]
DESIGNATES A WATERSHED FOR STUDY IN ACCORDANCE WITH this section.
(3) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may provide grants to subdivisions for flood control and watershed

HOUSE BILL 257 9
management capital projects, and for the capital costs related to design, purchase, and
installation of automated flood warning projects, provided that the projects are consistent
with the plans and implementation prepared and adopted in accordance with this subtitle,
and provided further that each project:
1. Is undertaken as part of a comprehensive flood
management plan prepared and adopted by the subdivision; and
2. Is [not inconsistent] CONSISTENT with any State or
interjurisdictional flood management plan.
(ii) Grants for automated flood warnings projects shall be
conditioned to require all affected local governing bodies to:
1. Adopt a specific and compatible response plan [which]
THAT has been coordinated with local emergency management authorities and reviewed
and approved by the Department and the Maryland Department of Emergency
Management; and
2. Provide for financial and other commitments to properly
operate and maintain the project.
(iii) 1. The amount of any grant made by the Department for a
flood control and watershed management capital project that involves only nonfederal
funds and meets the criteria of this subtitle shall be matched by a minimum amount of 25%
of project costs in [local government] SUBDIVISION or private funds.
2. For a flood control and watershed management capital
project that involves federal funding and meets the criteria of this subtitle:
A. The Department may provide up to 50% of the nonfederal
share of the project funding; and
B. [Local government] SUBDIVISION or private funds shall
provide not less than 50% of the nonfederal share of the project funding.
(iv) Each project application for a grant under this paragraph shall
be submitted to and reviewed by the State clearinghouse of the Department of Planning in
accordance with established clearinghouse procedures.
(4) (i) Subject to the approval of the Board of Public Works, the
Department may provide grants to subdivisions immediately after a flood for acquisition of
any flood damaged owner–occupied dwelling.

HOUSE BILL 257
(ii) Total expenditures for grants made under this paragraph may
not exceed [50%] 25% of the total authorized budgeted funds in a fiscal year for grants
under this subsection.
(5) [(i) The Department may award grants to subdivisions that have
incurred at least $ 1,000,000 in infrastructure damage caused by a flood event that occurred
on or after January 1, 2009.
(ii)] The total amount of grants awarded by the Department to
subdivisions FOR CONDUCTING FLOOD–RELATED WATERSHED STUDIES under this
[paragraph] SECTION may[:
1. For fiscal years 2020, 2021, and 2022, equal up to 100% of
the total amount of money appropriated to the comprehensive flood management program;
and
2. For], FOR fiscal year [2023] 2029 and each fiscal year
thereafter, equal up to [50%] 5% of the total amount of money appropriated to the
comprehensive flood management program.
[(iii) A grant awarded to a subdivision under this paragraph may be:
1. For an amount of up to 50% of the combined cost of
infrastructure repairs, watershed restoration, and emergency work associated with the
flood event;
2. Used for infrastructure repairs, watershed management,
or emergency protection work associated with the flood event; and
3. Used for expenses associated with item 2 of this
subparagraph that the subdivision has already incurred.
(iv) The Department shall prioritize awarding grants under this
paragraph to subdivisions in which:
1. Infrastructure damage occurred in an area designated by
the Maryland Historical Trust as an historic district; or
2. Infrastructure damage caused by a flood event has
occurred more than once within the previous 5 years.]
(6) To receive a grant, the subdivision must participate in the national
flood insurance program.
(7) Before awarding a grant under paragraphs (2), (3), or (4) of this
subsection, the Department, in cooperation with the Department of Planning, shall review

HOUSE BILL 257 11
the flood control and watershed management operations of the applicant subdivision to
assure that the flood control and watershed management operations are in compliance with
this subtitle.
(8) (i) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor
may include in the annual State budget an appropriation for the comprehensive flood
management grant program of up to $20,000,000.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, at least 40%
of funding provided under the comprehensive flood management grant program shall be
used for projects located in or directly benefiting underserved or overburdened
communities, as defined in § 1–701 of this article.
(iii) Funds not awarded from the comprehensive flood management
grant program by the end of a fiscal year:
1. Shall remain in the program; and
2. Are not subject to § 7–302 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(9) (i) The Department, in consultation with the Department of
Planning, shall adopt regulations necessary for the administration of the grant program.
(ii) These regulations may include:
1. A determination of statewide and interjurisdictional needs
and priorities;
2. Standards of eligibility for applicants and projects;
3. Criteria for recognition of tidal and nontidal areas;
4. Engineering and economic standards and alternatives;
and
5. Procedures for filing and processing contents of
applications.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Emergency Management, in coordination with
the Department of the Environment, the Department of Planning, and the Department of
Natural Resources, shall:
(1) evaluate natural hazard–specific State–level plan requirements for
local governments; and

HOUSE BILL 257
(2) make recommendations on the potential to reduce duplication and
streamline local hazard–planning requirements.
(b) On or before December 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of Emergency
Management shall report its recommendations under subsection (a)(2) of this section to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.